Washington statutes.
RCW 19.48.020

Record of guests—Hotels and trailer camps.

Every hotel and trailer camp shall keep a record of the arrival and departure of its guests in such a manner that the record will be a permanent one for at least one year from the date of departure: PROVIDED, That this requirement shall not apply with respect to guests of tenants in mobile home parks, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 186 s 14; 1955 c 138 s 1; 1915 c 190 s 2; RRS s 6861.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 186: See note following RCW 59.20.030.